Arkansas, session 2025, HB1066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-430(b), concerning the standard
deduction for income tax purposes, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The standard deduction shall be:
(A) For the tax year beginning January 1, 2014, two
thousand dollars ($2,000) per taxpayer; and
(B) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2015,
two thousand two hundred dollars ($2,200) per taxpayer; and
(C) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2026,
four thousand four hundred dollars ($4,400) per taxpayer.
(2) In the case of a married couple, each spouse shall be
entitled to claim a standard deduction of:
(A) For the tax year beginning January 1, 2014, two
thousand dollars ($2,000); and
(B) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2015,
two thousand two hundred dollars ($2,200); and
(C) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2026,
four thousand four hundred dollars ($4,400).
*JLL074*
02-19-2025 11:06:55 JLL074

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 HB1066

/s/Ray


































02-19-2025 11:06:55 JLL074